Louisiana, session 2026, SB194.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:233.4 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§233.4. Verification of citizenship of applicants for public benefits
A. Except as prohibited by federal law, a state agency or political subdivision
shall verify that each applicant who applies for federal, state, or local public benefit
is a person who has been recognized as a citizen of the United States by birthright,
naturalization, or any other method provided for under applicable federal law or, has
satisfactory immigration status as a qualified alien as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1641(b) ,or
receives coverage pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1396b(v)(4).
B. For the purposes of Medicaid, Medicare, the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (SNAP), and any health plan offered through the
Affordable Care Act marketplace, the term "qualified alien" shall be limited to:
(1) An alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence as an immigrant,
as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(15) and 1101(a)(20), excluding alien visitors,
tourists, diplomats, students, and other individuals admitted temporarily
without intent to abandon a foreign residence.
(2) An alien granted the status of Cuban or Haitian entrant, as defined
in Section 501(e) of the Refugee Education Assistance Act of 1980 (Pub. L.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 194 ENROLLED
96-422).
(3) An individual lawfully residing in the United States pursuant to a
Compact of Free Association, as referenced in 8 U.S.C. 1612(b)(2)(G).
B.C. For an applicant claiming United States citizenship or satisfactory
immigration status under 8 U.S.C. 1641(b), the state agency or political subdivision
shall make every reasonable effort to ascertain verification of the applicant's
citizenship or immigration status.
D.(1) For any applicant seeking enrollment in Medicaid, the Louisiana
Department of Health shall provide a single reasonable opportunity period, not
to exceed the minimum period required under federal law, for verification of
United States citizenship or satisfactory immigration status as a qualified alien,
as defined in Subsection B of this Section, when such status cannot be verified
through available data sources.
(2) Medicaid coverage may be provided provisionally during the
reasonable opportunity period where required by federal law.
(3) Failure to submit acceptable documentation within the reasonable
opportunity period required under federal law shall result in denial or
termination of Medicaid eligibility, subject to required notice.
(4) No additional reasonable opportunity period shall be granted to any
applicant who has previously been denied eligibility at any time due to a failure
to verify citizenship or satisfactory immigration status.
(5) The department shall seek any state plan amendment or waiver from
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services necessary to carry out the
provisions of this Section.
(6) The department has the discretion to provide emergency healthcare
services.
C.E. Upon the termination of any reasonable opportunity period to verify
citizenship status or receipt of a final verification that indicates that the applicant is
not a United States citizen or lacks satisfactory immigration status and has entered
the United States without inspection or admission or remained beyond the expiration
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 194 ENROLLED
of his authorized period of stay, the state agency or political subdivision shall:
(1) Refer the applicant's information, including unsatisfactory immigration
status, to United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.
(2) Provide a monthly report compiling the information pursuant to Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection to the secretary of state for voter list maintenance purposes.
(3) Terminate any recurring federal, state, or local public benefits as defined
in Subsection EH of this Section.
F. The entire income and financial resources of any individual rendered
ineligible for participation in SNAP under 7 U.S.C. 2015(f) and Subsections A
and B of this Section shall be considered available to the household and shall be
included in determining the eligibility and benefit allotment of the household of
which such individual is a member.
D.G. A state agency or political subdivision that administers federal or state
public benefits shall report at the end of each fiscal year to the president of the
Senate, speaker of the House of Representatives, governor, and David R. Poynter
Legislative Research Library on the results of the citizenship verification
requirements of this Section. The report shall include but not be limited to the
number of individuals reported to United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement and the number of individuals who had public assistance terminated in
accordance with this Section.
E.H. For the purposes of this Section, a federal, state, or local public benefit
shall include any retirement, welfare, health, disability, public or assisted housing,
food assistance, unemployment benefit, or any other similar benefit for which
payments or assistance are provided to an individual, household, or family eligibility
unit by an agency of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this
state or by appropriated funds of the United States, this state, or a political
subdivision of this state.
F.I. For purposes of any benefits paid by any public pension or retirement
system, fund, or plan, the verification of a public employee's United States
citizenship or satisfactory immigration status at the time of their enrollment in a
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 194 ENROLLED
public pension or retirement system, fund, or plan shall satisfy the verification
requirements of Subsection A of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.